Utah statutes.
70A-2a-219.   Risk of loss.
(1)  Except in the case of a finance lease, risk of loss is retained by the
lessor and does not pass to the lessee.  In the case of a finance lease, risk
of loss passes to the lessee.
(2)  Subject to the provisions of this chapter on the effect of default on
risk of loss as provided in Section 70A-2a-220, if risk of loss is to pass to
the lessee and the time of passage is not stated, the following rules apply:
(a)  If the lease contract requires or authorizes the goods to be shipped by
carrier:
(i)  and it does not require delivery at a particular destination, the risk of
loss passes to the lessee when the goods are duly delivered to the carrier;
but
(ii)  if it does require delivery at a particular destination and the goods
are there duly tendered while in the possession of the carrier, the risk of
loss passes to the lessee when the goods are there duly so tendered as to
enable the lessee to take delivery.
(b)  If the goods are held by a bailee to be delivered without being moved,
the risk of loss passes to the lessee on acknowledgment by the bailee of the
lessee's right to possession of the goods.
(c)  In any case not within Subsection (a) or (b), the risk of loss passes to
the lessee on the lessee's receipt of the goods if the lessor, or, in the case
of a finance lease, the supplier, is a merchant; otherwise the risk passes to
the lessee on tender of delivery.
